test/src/morphology/N-dalla_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - dållå: # -å-stammar
    dållå+N+Sg+Nom: dållå
    dållå+N+Sg+Gen: dålå
    dållå+N+Sg+Acc: dålåv
    dållå+N+Sg+Ill: dållåj
    dållå+N+Sg+Ine: dålån
    dållå+N+Sg+Ela: dålåst
    dållå+N+Sg+Com: dålåjn
    dållå+N+Pl+Nom: dålå
    dållå+N+Pl+Gen: dålåj
    dållå+N+Pl+Acc: dålåjt
    dållå+N+Pl+Ill: dålåjda
    dållå+N+Pl+Ine: dålåjn
    dållå+N+Pl+Ela: dålåjst
    dållå+N+Pl+Com: dålåj
    dållå+N+Ess: dållån
    dållå+N+Abe: dålådak
